North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 3. Contracts.

§ 160A-16.
Contracts to be in writing; exception.

All contracts made by or on behalf of a city shall be in writing. A contract made in violation of this section shall be void and unenforceable unless it is expressly ratified by the council.

History.

1917, c. 136, subch. 13, s. 8; C.S., s. 2831; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to report on guaranteed energy savings contracts, see

G.S. 143-64.17

G.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Regulation of Contractual Change: A Guide to No Oral Modification Clauses for North Carolina Lawyers,” see 81 N.C.L. Rev. 2239 (2003).

§ 160A-17.
Continuing contracts.

A city is authorized to enter into continuing contracts, some portion or all of which are to be performed in ensuing fiscal years. Sufficient funds shall be appropriated to meet any amount to be paid under the contract in the fiscal year in which it is made, and in each ensuing fiscal year, the council shall appropriate sufficient funds to meet the amounts to be paid during the fiscal year under continuing contracts previously entered into.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-17.1.
Grants from other governments.

Federal and State. — The governing body of any city or county is hereby authorized to make contracts for and to accept grants-in-aid and loans from the federal and State governments and their agencies for constructing, expanding, maintaining, and operating any project or facility, or performing any function, which such city or county may be authorized by general law or local act to provide or perform.In order to exercise the authority granted by this section, the governing body of any city or county may:

Enter into and carry out contracts with the State or federal government or any agency or institution thereof under which such government, agency, or institution grants financial or other assistance to the city or county;

Accept such assistance or funds as may be granted or loaned by the State or federal government with or without such a contract;

Agree to and comply with any lawful and reasonable conditions which are imposed upon such grants or loans;

(3a)

Agree to and comply with minimum minority business enterprise participation requirements established by the federal government and its agencies in projects financed by federal grants-in-aid or loans, by including such minimum requirements in the specifications for contracts to perform all or part of such projects and awarding bids pursuant to

G.S. 143-129

and 143-131, if applicable, to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders meeting these and any other specifications.

Make expenditures from any funds so granted.

Expired effective December 31, 2010.

History.

1971, c. 896, s. 10; c. 937, ss. 1, 1.5; 1973, c. 426, s. 8; 1981, c. 827; 2007-91, s. 1.

§ 3.
Security interests in United States Department of Agriculture loans.

A county or municipality may pledge a security interest in an escrow account funded with loan proceeds, or a certificate of deposit, to secure repayment of the loan, only if the loan is an interest-free loan agreement entered into with the United States Department of Agriculture or an authorized intermediary acting on behalf of the United States Department of Agriculture. Any such escrow account must be substantiated by a written escrow agreement, and the funds must be deposited in accordance with

G.S. 159-30

and

G.S. 159-31

. Any certificate of deposit shall comply with the requirements of

G.S. 159-30

.

An interest-free loan agreement entered into under this section is subject to approval by the Local Government Commission under Article 8 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, unless exempted in G.S. 159-148(b).

No deficiency judgment may be rendered against any county or municipality in any action for breach of a contractual obligation authorized by this section. The taxing power of a county or municipality is not and may not be pledged directly or indirectly to secure any moneys due under a contract authorized by this section.

History.

2015-207, s. 3.

§ 160A-18.
Certain deeds validated.

All deeds made, executed, and delivered by any city before July 1, 1970, for a good and valuable consideration are hereby in all respects validated, ratified, and confirmed notwithstanding any lack of authority to make the deed or any irregularities in the procedures by which conveyance of the land or premises described therein was authorized by the city council.

All conveyances and sales of any interest in real property by private sale, including conveyances in fee and releases of vested or contingent future interests, made by the governing body of any city, school district, or school administrative unit before July 1, 1970, are hereby validated, ratified, and confirmed notwithstanding the fact that such conveyances or releases were made by private sale and not after notice and public outcry.

(b1)

All conveyances of any interest in real property by private sale, including conveyance in fee, made by the governing body of any county before January 1, 1977, are hereby validated, ratified, and confirmed notwithstanding the fact that such conveyances were made by private sale, without advertisement, and not after notice and public outcry.

Nothing in this section shall affect any action or proceeding begun before January 1, 1977.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1924, c. 95; 1951, c. 44; 1959, c. 487; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1977, c. 1103.

§ 160A-19.
Leases.

A city is authorized to lease as lessee, with or without option to purchase, any real or personal property for any authorized public purpose. A lease of personal property with an option to purchase is subject to Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

History.

1973, c. 426, s. 9.

§ 160A-20.
Security interests.

Purchase. — A unit of local government may purchase, or finance or refinance the purchase of, real or personal property by installment contracts that create in some or all of the property purchased a security interest to secure payment of the purchase price to the seller or to an individual or entity advancing moneys or supplying financing for the purchase transaction.

Improvements. — A unit of local government may finance or refinance the construction or repair of fixtures or improvements on real property by contracts that create in some or all of the fixtures or improvements, or in all or some portion of the property on which the fixtures or improvements are located, or in both, a security interest to secure repayment of moneys advanced or made available for the construction or repair.

Accounts. — A unit of local government may use escrow accounts in connection with the advance funding of transactions authorized by this section, whereby the proceeds of the advance funding are invested pending disbursement. A unit of local government may also use other accounts, such as debt service payment accounts and debt service reserve accounts, to facilitate transactions authorized by this section. To secure transactions authorized by this section, a unit of local government may also create security interests in these accounts.

Nonsubstitution. — No contract entered into under this section may contain a nonsubstitution clause that restricts the right of a unit of local government to:

Continue to provide a service or activity; or

Replace or provide a substitute for any fixture, improvement, project, or property financed, refinanced, or purchased pursuant to the contract.

Oversight. — A contract entered into under this section is subject to approval by the Local Government Commission under Article 8 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes if it:

Meets the standards set out in G.S. 159-148(a)(1), 159-148(a)(2), and 159-148(a)(3), or involves the construction or repair of fixtures or improvements on real property; and

Is not exempted from the provisions of that Article by one of the exemptions contained in G.S. 159-148(b).

(e1)

Public Hospitals. —

A nonprofit entity operating or leasing a public hospital may enter into a contract pursuant to this section only if the nonprofit entity will have an ownership interest in the property being financed or refinanced, including a leasehold interest. The security interest granted in the property shall be only to the extent of the nonprofit entity’s property interest. In addition, any contract entered into by a nonprofit entity operating or leasing a public hospital pursuant to this section is subject to the approval of the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority that owns the hospital. Approval of the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority may be withheld only under one or more of the following circumstances:

(1)

The contract would cause the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority to breach or violate any covenant in an existing financing instrument entered into by the nonprofit entity.

(2)

The contract would restrict the ability of the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority to incur anticipated bank-eligible indebtedness under federal tax laws.

The entering into of the contract would have a material, adverse impact on the credit ratings of the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority or would otherwise materially interfere with an anticipated financing by the nonprofit entity.

Limit of Security. — No deficiency judgment may be rendered against any unit of local government in any action for breach of a contractual obligation authorized by this section. The taxing power of a unit of local government is not and may not be pledged directly or indirectly to secure any moneys due under a contract authorized by this section.

Public Hearing. — Before entering into a contract under this section involving real property, a unit of local government shall hold a public hearing on the contract. A notice of the public hearing shall be published once at least 10 days before the date fixed for the hearing.

Local Government Defined. — As used in this section, the term “unit of local government” means any of the following:

A county.

A city.

A water and sewer authority created under Article 1 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.

(3a)

A metropolitan sewerage district created under Article 5 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.

(3b)

A sanitary district created under Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

(3c)

A county water and sewer district created under Article 6 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.

(3d)

A metropolitan water district created under Article 4 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.

(3e)

A metropolitan water and sewerage district created under Article 5A of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.

An airport authority whose situs is entirely within a county that has (i) a population of over 120,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census and (ii) an area of less than 200 square miles.

An airport authority in a county in which there are two incorporated municipalities with a population of more than 65,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census.

(5a)

An airport board or commission authorized by agreement between two cities pursuant to

G.S. 63-56

, one of which is located partially but not wholly in the county in which the jointly owned airport is located, and where the board or commission provided water and wastewater services off the airport premises before January 1, 1995, except that the authority granted by this subdivision may be exercised by such a board or commission with respect to water and wastewater systems or improvements only.

(5b)

A local airport authority that was created pursuant to a local act of the General Assembly.

A local school administrative unit whose board of education is authorized to levy a school tax.

(6a)

Any other local school administrative unit, but only for the purpose of financing energy conservation measures acquired pursuant to Part 2 of Article 3B of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

(6b)

A community college, but only for the purpose of financing energy conservation measures acquired pursuant to Part 2 of Article 3B of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

An area mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse authority, acting in accordance with

G.S. 122C-147

.

A consolidated city-county, as defined by

G.S. 160B-2(1)

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-414, s. 52, effective September 14, 2001.

A regional natural gas district, as defined by Article 28 of this Chapter.

A regional public transportation authority or a regional transportation authority created pursuant to Article 26 or Article 27 of this Chapter.

A nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital as defined in

G.S. 159-39

.

A public health authority created under Part 1B of Article 2 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

A special district created under Article 43 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.

A Ferry Transportation Authority created pursuant to Article 29 of this Chapter.

History.

1979, c. 743; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 981, s. 1; 1989, c. 708; 1991, c. 741, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 592, s. 2; 1995, c. 461, s. 6; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 644, s. 2; 1997-380, s. 3; 1997-426, s. 7; 1997-426, s. 7.1; 1998-70, s. 1; 1998-117, s. 1; 1999-386, ss. 1, 2; 2001-414, s. 52; 2002-161, s. 10; 2003-259, s. 1; 2003-388, s. 3; 2007-226, s. 1; 2007-229, s. 3; 2009-527, s. 2(g); 2015-207, s. 5(a); 2017-120, s. 4.

§ 160A-20.1.
Contracts with private entities; contractors must use E-Verify.

Authority. — A city may contract with and appropriate money to any person, association, or corporation, in order to carry out any public purpose that the city is authorized by law to engage in. A city may not require a private contractor under this section to abide by any restriction that the city could not impose on all employers in the city, such as paying minimum wage or providing paid sick leave to its employees, as a condition of bidding on a contract.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-294, s. 1(b), effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to contracts entered into on or after that date.

History.

1985, c. 271, s. 1; 2013-413, s. 5(d); 2013-418, s. 2(b); 2014-119, s. 13(a); 2015-294, s. 1(b); 2016-3, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 2.3; 2017-4, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to procedure for letting of public contracts, see

G.S. 143-129

.

Executive Order No. 93.

On April 12, 2016, Governor Pat McCrory issued Executive Order No. 93, “To Protect Privacy and Equality,” which provides: “WHEREAS, North Carolina’s rich legacy of inclusiveness, diversity and hospitality makes North Carolina a global destination for jobs, business, tourists and talent;

“WHEREAS, it is the policy of the Executive Branch that government services be provided equally to all people;

“WHEREAS, N.C. Gen. Stat. § 160A-499.2 permits municipalities to adopt ordinances prohibiting discrimination in housing and real estate transactions, and any municipality may expand such ordinance consistent with the federal Fair Housing Act;

“WHEREAS, N.C. Gen. Stat. § 143-422.2(c) permits local governments or other political subdivisions of the State to set their own employment policies applicable to their own personnel;

“WHEREAS, North Carolina law allows private businesses and nonprofit employers to establish their own non-discrimination employment policies;

“WHEREAS, N.C. Gen. Stat. § 143-128.2 requires each city, county or other local public entity to adopt goals for participation by minority businesses and to make good faith efforts to recruit minority participation in line with those goals;

“WHEREAS, North Carolina law allows a private business or nonprofit to set their own restroom, locker room or shower policies;

“WHEREAS, our citizens have basic common-sense expectations of privacy in our restrooms, locker rooms and shower facilities for children, women and men;

“WHEREAS, to protect expectations of privacy in restrooms, locker rooms and shower facilities in public buildings, including our schools, the State of North Carolina maintains these facilities on the basis of biological sex;

“WHEREAS, State agencies and local governments are allowed to make reasonable accommodations in restrooms, locker rooms and shower facilities due to special individual circumstances;

“NOW, THEREFORE, pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor by the Constitution and laws of the State of North Carolina, IT IS ORDERED:

“Section 1. Public Services

“In the provision of government services and in the administration of programs, including, but not limited to public safety, health and welfare, public agencies shall serve all people equally, consistent with the mission and requirements of the service or program.

“Section 2. Equal Employment Opportunity Policy for State Employees

“I hereby affirm that the State of North Carolina is committed to administering and implementing all State human resources policies, practices and programs fairly and equitably, without unlawful discrimination, harassment or retaliation on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, political affiliation, genetic information, or disability.

“I also affirm that private businesses, nonprofit employers and local governments may establish their own non-discrimination employment policies.

“Section 3. Restroom Accommodations

“In North Carolina, private businesses can set their own rules for their own restroom, locker room and shower facilities, free from government interference.

“Under current law, every multiple occupancy restroom, locker room or shower facility located in a cabinet agency must be designated for and only used by persons based on their biological sex. Agencies may make reasonable accommodations upon a person’s request due to special circumstances.

“Therefore, when readily available and when practicable in the best judgment of the agency, all cabinet agencies shall provide a reasonable accommodation of a single occupancy restroom, locker room or shower facility upon request due to special circumstances.

“All council of state agencies, cities, counties, the University of North Carolina System and the North Carolina Community College System are invited and encouraged to make a similar accommodation when practicable.

“Section 4. State Buildings and Facilities Leased to Private Entities

“The Department of Administration shall interpret the application of N.C. Gen. Stat. § 143-760 as follows:

“When a private entity leases State real property and the property in the lessee’s exclusive possession includes multiple occupancy restrooms, locker rooms or other like facilities, the private entity will control the signage and use of these facilities.

“All council of state agencies, cities, counties, the University of North Carolina System and the North Carolina Community College System are invited and encouraged to adopt a similar interpretation of N.C. Gen. Stat. § 143-760.

“Section 5. Human Relations Commission

“Pursuant to N.C. Gen. Stat. § 143B-391, the Human Relations Commission in the Department of Administration shall promote equality and opportunity for all citizens.

“The Human Relations Commission shall work with local government officials to study problems and promote understanding, respect and goodwill among all citizens in all communities in North Carolina.

“The Human Relations Commission shall receive, investigate and conciliate fair housing, employment discrimination and public accommodations complaints.

“The Human Relations Commission shall submit an annual report by April 1st to the Governor detailing the number of complaints received, the number of investigations completed, and the number of conciliations in the preceding calendar year.
This report shall also describe any education and outreach efforts made by the Commission in that same calendar year.

“Section 6. State Cause of Action for Wrongful Discharge

“I support and encourage the General Assembly to take all necessary steps to restore a State cause of action for wrongful discharge based on unlawful employment discrimination.

“Section 7. State or Federal Law

“Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as an abrogation of any requirements otherwise imposed by applicable federal or state laws or regulations.

“IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto signed my name and affixed the Great Seal of the State of North Carolina at the Capitol in the City of Raleigh, this twelfth day of April in the year of our Lord two thousand and sixteen.”

Session Laws 2015-294, s. 17, made the repeal of subsection (b) of this section by Session Laws 2015-294, s. 1(b), applicable to contracts entered into on or after October 1, 2015.

Session Laws 2016-3, 2nd Ex. Sess., provides in its preamble: “Whereas, the North Carolina Constitution directs the General Assembly to provide for the organization and government of all cities and counties and to give cities and counties such powers and duties as the General Assembly deems advisable in Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution; and

“Whereas, the North Carolina Constitution reflects the importance of statewide laws related to commerce by prohibiting the General Assembly from enacting local acts regulating labor, trade, mining, or manufacturing in Section 24 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that laws and obligations consistent statewide for all businesses, organizations, and employers doing business in the State will improve intrastate commerce; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that laws and obligations consistent statewide for all businesses, organizations, and employers doing business in the State benefit the businesses, organizations, and employers seeking to do business in the State and attracts new businesses, organizations, and employers to the State; Now, therefore,”

Session Laws 2016-3, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 4, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2016-3, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 5, provides: “This act is effective when it becomes law [March 23, 2016] and applies to any action taken on or after that date, to any ordinance, resolution, regulation, or policy adopted or amended on or after that date, and to any contract entered into on or after that date. The provisions of Sections 2.1 [amending

G.S. 95-25.1

], 2.2 [amending G.S. 153A-449(a)], 2.3 [amending G.S. 160A-20.1(a)], 3.1 [amending

G.S. 143-422.2

], 3.2 [amending

G.S. 143-422.3

], and 3.3 [enacting Article 49B of Chapter 143] of this act supersede and preempt any ordinance, resolution, regulation, or policy adopted prior to the effective date of this act that purports to regulate a subject matter preempted by this act or that violates or is not consistent with this act, and such ordinances, resolutions, regulations, or policies shall be null and void as of the effective date of this act.”

Session Laws 2017-4, s. 1, effective March 30, 2017, provides: “S.L. 2016-3 and S.L. 2016-99 are repealed.” Session Laws 2016-3, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 2.3, effective March 23, 2016, and applicable to any action taken on or after that date, to any ordinance, resolution, regulation, or policy adopted or amended on or after that date, and to any contract entered into on or after that date, had amended subsection (a) by substituting “regulations or controls on the contractor’s employment practices or mandate or prohibit the provision of goods, services, or accommodations to any member of the public as a condition of bidding on a contract or a qualification-based selection, except as otherwise required or allowed by State law” for “any restriction that the city could not impose on all employers in the city, such as paying minimum wage or providing paid sick leave to its employees, as a condition of bidding on a contract.”

Session Laws 2017-4, s. 3, provides: “No local government in this State may enact or amend an ordinance regulating private employment practices or regulating public accommodations.” Section 3 of this act expires on December 1, 2020.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 5(d), effective August 23, 2013, added the second sentence in this section. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-418, s. 2(b), effective September 4, 2013, added “contractors must use E-verify” in the section heading; designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); added “Authority” as the subsection heading in subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2014-119, s. 13(a), effective October 1, 2014, inserted “subject to

G.S. 143-129

” near the beginning of subsection (b). See Editor’s note for applicability.

Session Laws, 2015-294, s. 1(b), effective October 1, 2015, repealed subsection (b). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2016-3, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 2.3, effective March 23, 2016, in the second sentence of subsection (a), substituted “regulations or controls on the contractor’s employment practices or mandate or prohibit the provision of goods, services, or accommodations to any member of the public as a condition of bidding on a contract or a qualification-based selection, except as otherwise required or allowed by State law” for “any restriction that the city could not impose on all employers in the city, such as paying minimum wage or providing paid sick leave to its employees, as a condition of bidding on a contract”.